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DI3MH-03

DTC 41 Fuel Tank Select Relay Circuit Malfunction
(Fuel Tank Changeover Switch ON)

Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-108.
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
Conditions (a), (b) and (c) continue: *Open or short in fuel tank select relay circuit
(a) Fuel tank changeover switch ON « Fuel tank select relay
41 (Voltage of FPMS terminal is high) *Open or short in sub fuel pump circuit
(b) Voltage of FPM1 terminal is high * Sub fuel pump
(c) Voltage of FPM2 terminal is low e Short in main fuel pump circuit (+B short)

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC 11 (Main Fuel Pump Circuit Malfunction) on page DI-108.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check fuel tank select relay (See page FI-49).

@

2 [ Check voltage between terminal FPM2 of engine ECU connector and body
ground (See page DI-122, step 1).

0K> Go to step 4.
NG \

3 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel tank change-
over switch and fuel tank select relay, fuel tank select relay and body ground
(See page IN-19).

NG> Replace fuel tank select relay.

then go to step 8.

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector, and
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4 | Check operation of sub fuel pump (See page DI-122, step 5).

HINT:
If you have no hand-held tester, and then go to step 5.

0K> Go to step 7.
NG \

5 [ Check sub fuel pump (See page FI-16).

NG> Replace sub fuel pump, and then go to step 8.

@

6 | Check for open or short in harness and connector between sub fuel pump and
fuel tank select relay (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace, and then go to step 8.

7 | Check for open and short in harness and connector between fuel tank select
relay and engine ECU, sub fuel tank forcing driving relay and engine ECU (See
page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace, and then go to step 8.
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8 | Check for short in harness and connector between main fuel pump and fuel tank
select relay (+B short circuit) (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK
~_—

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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